incubator/apertium-sme-smj.sme.dix
    <pardef n="Hánnofávl/i__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>liin</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ái</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lis</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>liiguin</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>liide</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lit</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>liid</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>liid</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>liin</l>
          <r>i<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ákšomu/otki__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otkin</l>
          <r>otki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otkkiin</l>
          <r>otki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otkái</l>
          <r>otki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otki</l>
          <r>otki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otkke</l>
          <r>otki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otkki</l>
          <r>otki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otkkis</l>
          <r>otki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tkkiiguin</l>
          <r>otki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tkkiide</l>
          <r>otki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otkkit</l>
          <r>otki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tkkiid</l>
          <r>otki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tkkiid</l>
          <r>otki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tkkiin</l>
          <r>otki<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Bi/kta__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ktan</l>
          <r>kta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vttain</l>
          <r>kta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ktii</l>
          <r>kta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kta</l>
          <r>kta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vtta</l>
          <r>kta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vtta</l>
          <r>kta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vttas</l>
          <r>kta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vttaiguin</l>
          <r>kta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vttaide</l>
          <r>kta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vttat</l>
          <r>kta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vttaid</l>
          <r>kta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vttaid</l>
          <r>kta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vttain</l>
          <r>kta<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ádjagas__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>san</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ain</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sii</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aiguin</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aide</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aid</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aid</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ain</l>
          <r><s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Ádjagas"><i>Ádjagas</i><par n="Ádjagas__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Áilegas"><i>Áilegas</i><par n="Ádjagas__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ákšomuotki"><i>Ákšomu</i><par n="Ákšomu/otki__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Hánnofávli"><i>Hánnofávl</i><par n="Hánnofávl/i__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Guovssahas"><i>Guovssahas</i><par n="Ádjagas__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Hállemas"><i>Hállemas</i><par n="Ádjagas__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ikkeldas"><i>Ikkeldas</i><par n="Ádjagas__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ikkaldas"><i>Ikkaldas</i><par n="Ádjagas__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Kreditordieđáhus"><i>Kreditordieđáhus</i><par n="Ádjagas__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Bikta"><i>Bi</i><par n="Bi/kta__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Ruoktosuodjalus"><i>Ruoktosuodjalus</i><par n="Ádjagas__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Bonjákas"><i>Bonjákas</i><par n="Ádjagas__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Bonjáhas"><i>Bonjáhas</i><par n="Ádjagas__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Čohkkiras"><i>Čohkkiras</i><par n="Ádjagas__N_Prop"/></e>
